District of Columbia statutes.
32-512

Effect on other laws.

Nothing in this chapter shall supersede any provision of law that provides greater employee family or medical leave rights than the family or medical rights established under this chapter.

History

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 13, 37 DCR 5043

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1312.